Ohio, session 136, HB267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4113.13 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4113.13. (A) The director of commerce, in consultation with the director of veterans services, shall create a veterans' benefits and services poster. The director of commerce shall include information about the following topics in the poster: (1) Programs provided by the department of veterans services, including the department's contact and web site information; (2) The United States department of veterans affairs veterans crisis line, including contact information for the crisis line; (3) Substance abuse and mental health treatment programs available to veterans; (4) Educational, workforce, and training resources available to veterans; (5) Tax benefits and exemptions available to veterans; (6) The availability of an armed forces designation on an Ohio driver's license or identification card; (7) Eligibility for unemployment benefits under Chapter 4141. of the Revised Code and federal unemployment compensation law; (8) Legal services available to veterans; (9) The availability of any other benefit or service relevant to veterans that the directors determine should be included on the poster. (B) An employer employing employees in this state may display a copy of the poster created under division (A) of this section on the employer's premises in a conspicuous place that is frequented by the largest number of employees and to which all employees have access. The director of commerce shall provide an employer with a copy of the poster free of charge at the request of the employer.